Florida, session 2026, HB1021.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 465.1894, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
465.1894 Administration of medications.—
(1) A pharmacist, at the direction of a physician licensed
under chapter 458 or chapter 459, who meets the following
qualifications may administer medications to a patient during a
life-threatening emergency event at a Level I, Level II, or
pediatric trauma center when delegated to perform such task:
(a) The pharmacist has completed an accredited
postgraduate residency training program; or
(b) The pharmacist has completed at least 3 years of
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1021-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1021 2026
direct patient care in a hospital setting.

A trauma center that permits a physician to delegate the
administration of medication to a pharmacist must maintain
records pursuant to s. 395.0197(5) including, but not limited
to, documentation that the administering pharmacist meets the
requirements of this section.
(2) The board shall adopt rules to administer this
section.
Section 2. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
395.0197, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
395.0197 Internal risk management program.—
(1) Every licensed facility shall, as a part of its
administrative functions, establish an internal risk management
program that includes all of the following components:
(b) The development of appropriate measures to minimize
the risk of adverse incidents to patients, including, but not
limited to:
1. Risk management and risk prevention education and
training of all nonphysician personnel as follows:
a. Such education and training of all nonphysician
personnel as part of their initial orientation; and
b. At least 1 hour of such education and training annually
for all personnel of the licensed facility working in clinical
areas and providing patient care, except those persons licensed
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1021-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1021 2026
as health care practitioners who are required to complete
continuing education coursework pursuant to chapter 456 or the
respective practice act.
2. A prohibition, except when emergency circumstances
require otherwise, against a staff member of the licensed
facility attending a patient in the recovery room, unless the
staff member is authorized to attend the patient in the recovery
room and is in the company of at least one other person.
However, a licensed facility is exempt from the two-person
requirement if it has:
a. Live visual observation;
b. Electronic observation; or
c. Any other reasonable measure taken to ensure patient
protection and privacy.
3. A prohibition against an unlicensed person from
assisting or participating in any surgical procedure unless the
facility has authorized the person to do so following a
competency assessment, and such assistance or participation is
done under the direct and immediate supervision of a licensed
physician and is not otherwise an activity that may only be
performed by a licensed health care practitioner.
4. Development, implementation, and ongoing evaluation of
procedures, protocols, and systems to accurately identify
patients, planned procedures, and the correct site of the
planned procedure so as to minimize the performance of a
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1021-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1021 2026
surgical procedure on the wrong patient, a wrong surgical
procedure, a wrong-site surgical procedure, or a surgical
procedure otherwise unrelated to the patient's diagnosis or
medical condition.
5. For a Level I, Level II, or pediatric trauma center,
development, implementation, and ongoing evaluation of
procedures, protocols, and systems to permit and comply with
pharmacist administration of medications to a patient during a
life-threatening emergency event, if the facility permits the
delegation of such task pursuant to s. 465.1894.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1021-02-c2